Utah statutes.
58-47b-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes the following and may be further defined by division rule:

(1)  maintaining, operating, or assisting in the establishment or operation of any place of business for the purpose of performing massage without first obtaining a business license, if a license is required;

(2)  failing to comply with any applicable ordinances relating to the regulation of massage establishment;

(3)  failing to comply with all applicable state and local health or sanitation codes;

(4)  failing to properly supervise an apprentice;

(5)  failing to maintain mechanical or electrical equipment in a safe operating condition;

(6)  failing to adequately monitor patrons utilizing steam rooms, dry heat cabinets, or water baths;

(7)  prescribing or administering medicine or drugs;

(8)  engaging in any act or practice in a professional capacity that is outside of the practice of massage therapy; and

(9)  engaging in any act or practice in a professional capacity for which the licensee is not competent to perform through training or experience.



Amended by Chapter 159, 1998 General Session

